Hawaii statutes.
[H.]
STUDENT ONLINE PERSONAL INFORMATION PROTECTION

[§302A-499] Definitions. As used in
this subpart, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Covered information" means
personally identifiable information or material, or information that is
linked to personally identifiable information or material, in any media or
format that is not publicly available and is:

(1) Created by or provided to an operator by a
student, or the student's parent or legal guardian, in the course of the
student's, parent's, or legal guardian's use of the operator's site, service,
or application for K–12 school purposes;

(2) Created by or provided to an operator by
an employee or agent of a K-12 school or complex for K-12 school purposes; or

(3) Gathered by an operator through the
operation of its site, service, or application for K-12 school purposes and
personally identifies a student, including information in the student's
educational record or electronic mail, first and last name, home address,
telephone number, electronic mail address, or other information that allows
physical or online contact, discipline records, test results, special education
data, juvenile dependency records, grades, evaluations, criminal records,
medical records, health records, social security number, biometric information,
disabilities, socioeconomic information, food purchases, political
affiliations, religious information, text messages, documents, student
identifiers, search activity, photos, voice recordings, or geolocation
information.

"Interactive computer service" means
that term as defined in title 47 United States Code section 230.

"K-12 school" means a school that
offers any of grades kindergarten to twelve and that is a public school, as
defined in section 302A-101.

"K–12 school purposes" means purposes
that are directed by or that customarily take place at the direction of a K-12
school, teacher, or complex area superintendent or that aid in the
administration of school activities, including instruction in the classroom or
at home, administrative activities, and collaboration between students, school
personnel, parents or legal guardians, or are otherwise for the use and benefit
of the school.

"Operator" means, to the extent that
it is operating in this capacity, the operator of a website, online service,
online application, or mobile application with actual knowledge that the site,
service, or application is used primarily for K–12 school purposes and was
designed and marketed for K–12 school purposes.

"Targeted advertising" means presenting
advertisements to a student where the advertisement is selected based on
information obtained or inferred over time from that student's online behavior,
usage of applications, or covered information. "Targeted
advertising" does not include advertising to a student at an online
location based upon that student's current visit to that location, or in
response to that student’s request for information or feedback, without the
retention of that student's online activities or requests over time for the purpose
of targeting subsequent advertisements. [L 2016, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next